Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6292.
people of the state of michigan enact: PART 27B PHYSICIAN RECRUITMENT PROGRAM Sec. 2741. (1) As used in this part: (a) "MiDOCS advisory commission" or "advisory commission" means the MiDOCS advisory commission created in section 2748. (b) "MiDOCS program" or "program" means the MiDOCS program created in section 2743. (c) "Physician" means a physician licensed under part 170 or 175. (d) "Primary care" means the specialties of family practice, internal medicine, pediatrics, obstetrics, psychiatry, or emergency medicine. (e) "Service obligation" means a contractual obligation meeting the requirements of section 2745. (f) "Underserved community" means a geographic area, population group, or health facility designated by the department under section 2747. (2) In addition, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code. Sec. 2743. (1) The MiDOCS program is created in the department to partner with medical schools in this state to create new primary care residency slots in underserved communities and increase the recruitment and retention of physicians practicing in underserved communities. (2) In operating the MiDOCS program, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Work with medical schools to create new residency slots for physicians who practice primary care in underserved communities. The department shall ensure that at least 1 new primary care residency slot is created within each medical school in this state that trains physicians in primary care. (b) Recruit and place physicians in underserved communities, as provided in this part. (c) Engage in activities to promote the MiDOCS program. (d) Fulfill other department functions as provided in this part. Sec. 2745. (1) The department shall administer the MiDOCS program to provide physicians with assistance with repaying loans as a result of attending programs for the training of physicians. The department may each year pay all or part of an expense described in this subsection. The department shall pay an expense only for a physician who has entered into a service obligation with the department. The service obligation must be in writing and must include all of the following: (a) That the physician will engage in the full-time practice of primary care in an underserved community to which the physician is assigned by the department for a period of 2 years. (b) That the physician will forego any subspecialty training for at least 2 years postresidency. (c) The amount the department shall pay on behalf of the physician and the amount payable for each year of service. (2) An expense paid on behalf of a physician under subsection (1) for fulfilling a service obligation must be paid in a lump sum at the completion of each year of the service obligation. Sec. 2747. (1) The department shall develop criteria for identifying and designating a geographic area, population group, or health facility as an underserved community of this state. In developing the criteria, the department shall consider the needs of rural and urban areas. (2) On the basis of the criteria set forth in subsection (1), the department shall identify and designate geographic areas, population groups, and health facilities in this state as underserved communities for 1 or more physicians under the MiDOCS program. (3) The department shall exercise its discretion in selecting an underserved community for assignment of a physician. The department may establish guidelines for priority among rural or urban underserved areas in assignments of physicians to those areas. Sec. 2748. (1) The MiDOCS advisory commission is created in the department. The MiDOCS advisory commission must consist of the following members, appointed by the director as follows: (a) One representative from the Michigan Primary Care Association. (b) One representative from the Michigan Center for Rural Health. (c) One representative from the Michigan Area Health Education Center. (d) One representative from the Michigan Academy of Family Physicians. (e) Any other individual that the director considers necessary or appropriate. (2) The director shall appoint the first members of the advisory commission. (3) The term of a member of the advisory commission is 3 years or until a successor is appointed under subsection (1), whichever is later. (4) If a vacancy occurs on the advisory commission, the director shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. (5) The director may remove a member of the advisory commission for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. (6) The director shall call the first meeting of the advisory commission. At the first meeting, the advisory commission shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that the advisory commission considers necessary or appropriate. The advisory commission shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of a majority of the members. (7) A majority of the members of the advisory commission constitute a quorum for transacting business. An agreement of a majority of the members of the advisory commission serving is required for any action of the advisory commission. (8) The advisory commission shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (9) A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the advisory commission in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (10) A member of the advisory commission is not entitled to compensation for service on the advisory commission, but a member may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving as provided under section 1216. (11) The advisory commission shall make recommendations to the department on all of the following: (a) Oversight of the MiDOCS program. (b) Methods to support the implementation of the MiDOCS program. (c) Recruiting, training, and retaining primary care physicians in underserved communities. (d) Methods to maximize training opportunities with community health centers, rural critical access hospitals, solo or group private practice physician offices, schools, and community-based clinics. (e) Methods to increase residency slots in primary care. Sec. 2749. (1) The MiDOCS program fund is created within the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (5) The department shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, only for the purpose of implementing this part. Sec. 2750. (1) The department, after considering any recommendations from the MiDOCS advisory commission, shall promulgate rules to implement this part. (2) The department shall publish an annual report on the MiDOCS program and submit a copy of the report to the governor, the standing committees in the senate and the house of representatives responsible for health policy, and the chairs of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees, including the appropriations committee on the department's budget. The department shall also post the report on the department's website in an area available to the public. The report must include at least all of the following information: (a) The cost-effectiveness of the MiDOCS program and how the department determined the cost-effectiveness of the program. (b) The successes of the MiDOCS program and challenges of the program. (c) Recommendations on changes to the MiDOCS program.